Alaska statutes. Title 26. Military Affairs, Veterans, Disasters, and Aerospace.
Article 2. Military Justice.
Sec. 26.05.615.
Appeal by the state.

In a trial by court-martial in which a punitive discharge may be imposed, the state may appeal to the Military Appeals Commission established under this chapter

an order or ruling of the military judge that terminates the proceedings with respect to a charge or specification;

an order or ruling that excludes evidence that is substantial proof of a fact material in the proceeding;

an order or ruling that directs the disclosure of classified information;

an order or ruling that imposes sanctions for nondisclosure of classified information;

the refusal of the military judge to issue a protective order sought by the prosecution to prevent the disclosure of classified information;

the refusal of the military judge to enforce an order issued under (5) of this subsection that was previously issued by an appropriate authority.

An appeal of an order or ruling may not be taken unless the trial counsel provides the military judge with written notice of appeal from the order or ruling within 72 hours after the order or ruling. The notice must include a certification by the trial counsel that the appeal is not taken for the purpose of delay and, if the order or ruling appealed is one that excludes evidence, that the evidence excluded is substantial proof of a fact material in the proceeding.

An appeal under this section shall be forwarded to the Military Appeals Commission under AS

26.05.640

. In ruling on the appeal, the Military Appeals Commission may act only with respect to matters of law.

A period of delay resulting from an appeal under this section shall be excluded in deciding an issue involving the denial of a speedy trial, unless an appropriate authority determines that the appeal was filed solely for the purpose of delay with the knowledge that it was frivolous and without merit.

The state may not appeal a finding of not guilty with respect to a charge or specification by the members of the court-martial, or by a judge in a bench trial if the finding was not made on reconsideration.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS

26.05.525

; renumbered in 2016 at which time cross references to other renumbered sections were also corrected.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.620.
Vacation of suspension.

A probationer serving a period of probation under a sentence suspended by a special court-martial that, as approved, includes a bad-conduct discharge, or a suspended general court-martial sentence, is entitled to a hearing before the suspension is vacated. The probationer shall be represented at the hearing by military counsel if the probationer requests representation.

If the suspended sentence was imposed by a special court-martial, the officer having special court-martial jurisdiction over the probationer shall hold a hearing on the alleged violation of probation. The record of the hearing and the recommendation of the officer having special court-martial jurisdiction shall be sent for action to the officer exercising general court-martial jurisdiction over the probationer. If the officer vacates the suspension, the unexecuted part of the sentence, except a dismissal, shall be executed, subject to applicable restrictions in the code of military justice.

The suspension of another sentence may be vacated by an authority for the command in which the accused is serving or detailed who is competent to convene a court of the kind that imposed the sentence.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS 26.05.528; renumbered in 2016.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.625.
Petition for a new trial.

At any time within two years after approval by the convening authority of a court-martial sentence, the accused may petition the adjutant general for a new trial on the grounds of newly discovered evidence or fraud on the court-martial.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS

26.05.530

; renumbered in 2016.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.630.
Restoration.

All rights, privileges, and property affected by an executed part of a court-martial sentence that has been set aside or disapproved, except an executed dismissal or discharge, shall be restored unless a new trial or rehearing is ordered and the executed part is included in a sentence imposed on the new trial or rehearing.

If a previously executed sentence of dishonorable or bad-conduct discharge is not imposed on a new trial, the governor may substitute an administrative form of discharge unless the accused is to serve out the remainder of the accused’s enlistment.

If a previously executed sentence of dismissal is not imposed on a new trial, the governor may substitute an administrative form of discharge, and a commissioned officer dismissed under the original sentence may be reappointed by the governor alone to the commissioned grade and rank that, in the opinion of the governor, the former officer would have attained had the officer not been dismissed. The reappointment of the former officer shall be without regard to the existence of a vacancy and shall affect the promotion status of other officers only to the extent the governor may direct. The time between the dismissal and the reappointment shall be considered as actual service for all purposes, including the right to pay and allowances.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS 26.05.533; renumbered in 2016.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.635.
Leave required to be taken pending review of court-martial convictions.

In accordance with rules adopted under AS

26.05.360

, an accused who has been sentenced by a court-martial may be required to take leave pending completion of action under this chapter if the sentence includes an unsuspended dismissal or an unsuspended dishonorable or bad-conduct discharge. The accused may be required to begin the leave on the date on which the sentence is approved under the code of military justice, or at any time after that date, and the leave may be continued until the date on which action under this chapter is completed, or may be terminated at an earlier time.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS

26.05.535

; renumbered in 2016 at which time cross references to other renumbered sections were also corrected.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.640.
Military Appeals Commission.

The Military Appeals Commission is established in the Department of Military and Veterans’ Affairs. The commission is a quasi-judicial agency.

The commission has

jurisdiction to hear appeals from courts-martial by the

state in accordance with AS

26.05.615

; and

accused regarding sentences, punishments, clearly erroneous findings, and matters of law; and

the discretion to remand those cases to a competent court-martial.

The commission consists of three members appointed by the governor and confirmed by a majority of the members of the legislature in joint session. A member shall be a resident of this state and

be licensed to practice law

in this state and be a member in good standing of the Alaska Bar Association;

in another state and be a member in good standing of the bar of that state; or

as a member of the bar of a federal court;

have engaged in the active practice of law for at least five years;

be a former commissioned officer in the armed forces of the United States or the reserve components, or in the militia of a state; and

have at least five years’ experience as an officer in the judge advocate general’s corps of the armed forces of the United States or the militia of the state.

Except as provided in AS

39.05.080

(4), an appointee selected to fill a vacancy shall hold office for the unexpired term of the member whose vacancy is filled. A vacancy in the commission does not impair the authority of a quorum of members to exercise the powers and perform the duties of the commission.

A member may be reappointed if the reappointment complies with this section.

The members of the commission shall select a chair from among the members of the commission. The selection shall be subject to the approval of the adjutant general.

The governor may remove a commissioner from office for cause including incompetence, neglect of duty, or misconduct in office. A commissioner, to be removed for cause, shall be given a copy of the charges and offered an opportunity to be publicly heard in person or by counsel in the commissioner’s own defense upon not less than 10 days’ notice. If a commissioner is removed for cause, the governor shall file with the lieutenant governor a complete statement of all charges made against the commissioner and the governor’s finding based on the charges, together with a complete record of the proceedings.

The adjutant general shall adopt regulations to govern appellate procedure before the Military Appeals Commission. The regulations shall be substantially similar to the provisions for post-trial procedure and review of courts-martial under 10 U.S.C. 801 - 946. The regulations must be approved by the governor. Regulations adopted under this section are exempt from AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act).

The governor may appoint an alternate member, who will serve temporarily in cases where a Military Appeals Commission member is removed or otherwise unavailable to perform the duties of a commission member. The alternate member must be confirmed by a majority of the members of the legislature in joint session and otherwise meet the qualifications specified in (c) of this section.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS 26.05.538; renumbered in 2016 at which time cross references to other renumbered sections were also corrected.

Cross references. —

For provision relating to the initial appointments under this section, see sec. 12, ch. 55, SLA 2016, in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.645.
Review by civilian court.

After exhausting all remedies available under the code of military justice, a party may file a petition for review in the Alaska supreme court from a final decision of the Military Appeals Commission that upholds a conviction and sentence imposed by a general or special court-martial for an offense under this chapter if the sentence

includes confinement imposed under the code of military justice; and

meets the criteria for appeal under AS

12.55.120

.

A decision by the Alaska supreme court on a matter reviewed under a petition filed under (a) of this section is final and binding on all parties, the Military Appeals Commission, and the court-martial.

A party filing a petition for review under this section shall comply with the rules of court applicable to petitions for review in the appellate courts, including the deadlines for filing.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS

26.05.540

; renumbered in 2016.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.650.
Appellate and civilian counsel.

If the attorney general requests representation, the senior force judge advocate shall detail a judge advocate as appellate counsel to represent the state in a proceeding filed under AS

26.05.640

as civilian counsel, in a petition filed under AS

26.05.645

, or as counsel before any federal court.

The accused has the right to be represented by detailed military counsel before the Military Appeals Commission under AS

26.05.640

and before the reviewing court in a petition filed under AS

26.05.645

.

Upon the request of an accused entitled to be represented under (b) of this section, the senior force judge advocate shall detail a judge advocate to represent the accused in a review or appeal. Counsel detailed under this subsection shall meet the criteria for counsel under AS

26.05.475(d)

.

A person who has acted as investigating officer, trial counsel, military judge, witness, or court member in the case may not act as civilian review counsel for the accused detailed under (c) of this section.

An accused may choose to be represented by civilian counsel at the expense of the accused.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS 26.05.543; renumbered in 2016 at which time cross references to other renumbered sections were also corrected.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.655.
Authority to administer oaths and act as notary public.

The following persons may administer oaths for the purposes of military administration, including military justice:

a judge advocate;

a summary court-martial;

the adjutant general and assistant adjutant generals;

a commanding officer of the militia;

a person authorized by federal or state statute or regulation or by regulations of the armed forces of the United States or the state to administer oaths or act as a notary public.

The following persons may administer oaths necessary in the performance of their duties:

the president, military judge, and trial counsel for general and special courts-martial;

an officer designated to take a deposition;

a person detailed to conduct an investigation;

a recruiting officer;

a person authorized by federal or state statute or regulation or by regulations of the armed forces of the United States to administer oaths or act as a notary public.

The person’s signature without seal, together with the title of the person’s office, is prima facie evidence of the person’s authority to administer oaths and act as a notary public under this section.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS

26.05.545

; renumbered in 2016.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.660.
Delegation by the governor.

The governor may delegate any authority vested in the governor under the code of military justice, and provide for the subdelegation of the authority, except the powers given to the governor by AS

26.05.170

and

26.05.450

.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS

26.05.550

; renumbered in 2016 at which time cross references to other renumbered sections were also corrected.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.665.
Military justice account.

The military justice account is established in the general fund for the purpose of paying the expenses of the department in carrying out its duties relating to the code of military justice, including the fees and authorized travel expenses of witnesses, experts, victims, court reporters, and interpreters, fees for the service of process, costs of collection, apprehension, detention, and confinement, pay and allowances for court-martial duty, and all other necessary expenses of the prosecution and administration of military justice not otherwise payable by another source.

The account consists of money appropriated to it by the legislature and interest received on money in the account.

The department may use money appropriated to the account to pay for expenses related to the duties described in (a) of this section.

Money appropriated to the account does not lapse.

Nothing in this section creates a dedicated fund.

In this section, “account” means the military justice account established under (a) of this section.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS 26.05.553; renumbered in 2016.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.670.
Payment, collection, and deposit of fines.

A fine imposed by a military court or through the imposition of nonjudicial punishment may be paid to the state and delivered to the court or imposing officer, or to a person executing process.

If the person on whom the fine was imposed fails to pay, the department may collect the fine by

retaining pay or allowances due or to become due to the person fined from the militia of the state or the United States;

garnishment or levy, together with costs, on the wages, goods, and property of a person delinquent in paying a fine in accordance with AS 09.38.

A fine or penalty required to be paid under this section shall be deposited into the general fund and accounted for under AS

37.05.142

.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS

26.05.555

; renumbered in 2016.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.675.
Pay and allowances for court-martial duty.

For each day of duty as a member of a general court-martial, or as a witness under summons from the president or judge advocate of the court, officers and enlisted persons shall be paid as provided in AS

26.05.260(b)

.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS 26.05.558; renumbered in 2016.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.680.
Uniformity of interpretation.

The code of military justice shall be construed to carry out its general purpose and, so far as practicable, in a manner uniform with 10 U.S.C. 801 - 946.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS

26.05.560

; renumbered in 2016.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.685.
Immunity for action of military courts.

A person acting under the code of military justice, whether as a member of the militia or as a civilian, shall be immune from any personal liability for any of the acts or omissions that the person did or failed to do as part of the person’s duties under the code of military justice.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS 26.05.563; renumbered in 2016.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.690.
Principals.

A member of the militia who commits an offense under this chapter, or aids, abets, counsels, commands, solicits, or procures the commission of the offense, or causes an act to be done that, if directly performed by the member, would be punishable under this chapter, is a principal.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS 26.05.577; renumbered in 2016.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.695.
Accessory after the fact.

A member of the militia who, knowing that an offense under this chapter has been committed, receives, comforts, or assists the offender in order to hinder or prevent the offender’s apprehension, trial, or punishment may be punished by up to one year of confinement, by separation with characterization up to dishonorable discharge, and by such other punishment as a court-martial may direct.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS 26.05.578; renumbered in 2016.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.697.
Misprision of serious offense.

A member of the militia who (1) knows that another person has committed a serious offense, (2) wrongfully conceals the commission of the offense, and (3) fails to make the commission of the offense known to a civilian or military authority as soon as possible may be punished by up to three years of confinement, by separation with characterization up to dishonorable discharge, and by such other punishment as a court-martial may direct.

History.

(§ 12 ch 85 SLA 2018)

Effective dates. —

Section 45, ch. 85, SLA 2018 makes this section effective January 1, 2019.

Sec. 26.05.700.
Conviction of lesser included offense.

An accused may be found guilty of an offense necessarily included in the offense charged, of an attempt to commit either the offense under this chapter charged or an offense necessarily included in the offense charged, or of an offense designated by the President of the United States, in the most recent Manual for Courts-Martial, United States, as a presidentially prescribed lesser included offense under 10 U.S.C. 879.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016; am § 13 ch 85 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS 26.05.579; renumbered in 2016.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, added “, or of an offense designated by the President of the United States, in the most recent Manual for Courts-Martial, United States, as a presidentially prescribed lesser included offense under 10 U.S.C. 879” and made related changes.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.705.
Attempts.

An act done with specific intent to commit an offense under this chapter that amounts to more than mere preparation and tends, even though failing, to effect its commission, is an attempt to commit the offense.

A member of the militia who attempts to commit an offense under this chapter may be punished as a court-martial may direct, unless otherwise specifically prescribed. However, a court-martial may not direct a punishment for an attempt to commit an offense that is greater than the maximum punishment for the offense.

A member of the militia may be convicted of an attempt to commit an offense under this chapter even if it appears, at the trial, that the offense was consummated.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS

26.05.580

; renumbered in 2016.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.710.
Conspiracy.

A member of the militia who conspires with another person to commit an offense under this chapter may, if one or more of the conspirators does an act to effect the object of the conspiracy, be punished as a court-martial may direct, unless otherwise specifically prescribed. However, a court-martial may not direct a punishment for conspiracy to commit an offense that is greater than the maximum punishment for the offense.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS 26.05.581; renumbered in 2016.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.715.
Solicitation.

A member of the militia who solicits or advises another or others to desert in violation of AS

26.05.730

or to mutiny in violation of AS

26.05.775

may, if the offense solicited or advised is attempted or committed, be punished with the punishment provided for the commission of the offense, but, if the offense solicited or advised is not attempted or committed, the member may be punished by up to one year of confinement, by separation with characterization up to dishonorable discharge, and by such other punishment as a court-martial may direct.

A member of the militia who solicits or advises another or others to commit an act of misbehavior before the enemy in violation of AS

26.05.800

or an act of sedition in violation of AS

26.05.775

may, if the offense solicited or advised is committed, be punished with the punishment provided for the commission of the offense, but, if the offense solicited or advised is not committed, the member may be punished by up to one year of confinement, by separation with characterization up to dishonorable discharge, and by such other punishment as a court-martial may direct.

A member of the militia who solicits or advises another person to commit an offense under this chapter, other than an offense specified in (a) or (b) of this section, may be punished by confinement for up to the maximum punishment of the underlying offense, by separation with characterization up to dishonorable discharge, and by such other punishment as a court-martial may direct.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016; am § 14 ch 85 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS 26.05.582; renumbered in 2016 at which time cross references to other renumbered sections were also corrected.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, added (c).

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.720.
Fraudulent enlistment, appointment, or separation.

A person who procures the person’s own enlistment or appointment in the militia of the state by knowingly false representation or deliberate concealment as to the person’s qualifications for the enlistment or appointment and receives pay or allowances under the enlistment or appointment, or procures the person’s own separation from the militia of the state by knowingly false representation or deliberate concealment as to the person’s eligibility for that separation, may be punished by up to one year of confinement, by separation with characterization up to dishonorable discharge, and by such other punishment as a court-martial may direct.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS 26.05.583; renumbered in 2016.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.725.
Unlawful enlistment, appointment, or separation.

A member of the militia who effects an enlistment or appointment in or a separation from the militia of the state of a person who is known to the member to be ineligible for that enlistment, appointment, or separation because it is prohibited by law, regulation, or order may be punished by up to one year of confinement, by separation with characterization up to dishonorable discharge, and by such other punishment as a court-martial may direct.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS 26.05.584; renumbered in 2016.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.730.
Desertion.

A person is guilty of desertion if the person is a member of the militia and

without authority, goes or remains absent from the person’s unit, organization, or place of duty with intent to remain away from the unit, organization, or place of duty permanently;

quits the person’s unit, organization, or place of duty with intent to avoid hazardous duty or to shirk important service; or

without being regularly separated from one force of the militia of the state,

enlists or accepts an appointment in the same or another force of the militia of the state, the military forces of another state, or one of the armed forces of the United States, without fully disclosing the fact that the person has not been regularly separated; or

enters a foreign armed service except when authorized by the United States.

A commissioned officer of the militia commits the offense of desertion if, after tender of the officer’s resignation and before notice of its acceptance, the officer quits the officer’s post or proper duties without leave and with intent to remain away permanently.

A person found guilty of desertion or attempt to desert may be punished, if the offense is committed in time of war, or emergency as described in AS

26.05.070

,

by confinement of not more than 10 years, by separation with a characterization up to dishonorable discharge, and by such other punishment as a court-martial may direct if the offense is committed in time of war;

by up to one year of confinement, by separation with characterization up to dishonorable discharge, and by such other punishment as a court-martial may direct if the desertion or attempt to desert occurs at a time other than a time of war.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS

26.05.585

; renumbered in 2016.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.735.
Absence without leave.

A member of the militia who, without authority, (1) fails to go to the member’s appointed place of duty at the time prescribed, (2) goes from the member’s place of duty, or (3) is absent or remains absent from the member’s unit, organization, or place of duty at which the member is required to be at the time prescribed may be punished by up to one year of confinement, by separation with characterization up to dishonorable discharge, and by such other punishment as a court-martial may direct.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS 26.05.586; renumbered in 2016.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.737.
False or unauthorized pass offenses.

A member of the militia who wrongfully and falsely makes, alters, counterfeits, or tampers with a military or official pass, permit, discharge certificate, or identification card may be punished by up to one year of confinement, by separation with characterization up to dishonorable discharge, and by such other punishment as a court-martial may direct.

A member of the militia who wrongfully sells, gives, lends, or disposes of a false or unauthorized military or official pass, permit, discharge certificate, or identification card, knowing that the pass, permit, discharge certificate, or identification card is false or unauthorized, may be punished by up to one year of confinement, by separation with characterization up to dishonorable discharge, and by such other punishment as a court-martial may direct.

A member of the militia who wrongfully uses or possesses a false or unauthorized military or official pass, permit, discharge certificate, or identification card, knowing that the pass, permit, discharge certificate, or identification card is false or unauthorized, may be punished by up to one year of confinement, by separation with characterization up to dishonorable discharge, and by such other punishment as a court-martial may direct.

History.

(§ 15 ch 85 SLA 2018)

Effective dates. —

Section 46,
ch. 85, SLA 2018 makes this section effective January 1, 2019.

Sec. 26.05.740.
Missing movement; jumping from vessel.

A member of the militia who, (1) through neglect or design, misses the movement of a ship, aircraft, or unit with which the member is required, in the course of duty, to move, or (2) intentionally or wrongfully jumps into the water from a vessel in use by the armed forces may be punished by up to one year of confinement, by separation with characterization up to dishonorable discharge, and by such other punishment as a court-martial may direct.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016; am § 16 ch 85 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS 26.05.587; renumbered in 2016.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, added “, or (2) intentionally or wrongfully jumps into the water from a vessel in use by the armed forces” and made a related change.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.745.
Contempt toward officials.

A commissioned officer of the militia who uses contemptuous words against the President or Vice President of the United States, the United States Congress, the United States Secretary of Defense, the United States Secretary of Homeland Security, the secretary of a military department of the United States, or the governor or legislature of this state may be punished by separation with characterization up to dishonorable discharge and by such other punishment as a court-martial may direct.

A court-martial may not impose a sentence of confinement under this section.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS 26.05.588; renumbered in 2016.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.750.
Disrespect toward superior commissioned officer.

A member of the militia who behaves with disrespect toward the member’s superior commissioned officer may be punished by separation with characterization up to dishonorable discharge and by such other punishment as a court-martial may direct.

A court-martial may not impose a sentence of confinement under this section.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS 26.05.589; renumbered in 2016.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.755.
Assaulting or wilfully disobeying superior commissioned officer.

A member of the militia who (1) strikes the member’s superior commissioned officer or draws or lifts up any weapon or offers any violence against the superior officer while the superior officer is in the execution of the superior officer’s office, or (2) wilfully disobeys a lawful command of the member’s superior commissioned officer may be punished by up to five years of confinement, by separation with characterization up to dishonorable discharge, and by such other punishment as a court-martial may direct.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS

26.05.590

; renumbered in 2016.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.760.
Insubordinate conduct toward warrant officer, noncommissioned officer, or petty officer.

A warrant officer or enlisted member of the militia who (1) strikes or assaults a warrant officer, noncommissioned officer, or petty officer, while the officer is in the execution of the officer’s office, (2) wilfully disobeys the lawful order of a warrant officer, noncommissioned officer, or petty officer, or (3) treats with contempt or is disrespectful in language or deportment toward a warrant officer, noncommissioned officer, or petty officer while the officer is in the execution of the officer’s office may be punished by up to two years of confinement, by separation with characterization up to dishonorable discharge, and by such other punishment as a court-martial may direct.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS 26.05.591; renumbered in 2016.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.